tests/possessives_singular_wiki_sakhatyla.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Possessive cases singular": 
 
    ат<n><px1sg><nom> : атым
    ат<n><px1sg><acc> : аппын
    ат<n><px1sg><par> : аппына
    ат<n><px1sg><dat> : аппар
    ат<n><px1sg><abl> : аппыттан
    ат<n><px1sg><ins> : аппынан
    ат<n><px1sg><com> : аппыныын
    ат<n><px1sg><comp> : аппынааҕар

    ат<n><px2sg><nom> : атыҥ
    ат<n><px2sg><acc> : аккын
    ат<n><px2sg><par> : аккына
    ат<n><px2sg><dat> : аккар
    ат<n><px2sg><abl> : аккыттан
    ат<n><px2sg><ins> : аккынан
    ат<n><px2sg><com> : аккыныын
    ат<n><px2sg><comp> : аккынааҕар

    ат<n><px3sg><nom> : ата
    ат<n><px3sg><acc> : атын
    ат<n><px3sg><par> : атына
    ат<n><px3sg><dat> : атыгар
    ат<n><px3sg><abl> : атыттан
    ат<n><px3sg><ins> : атынан
    ат<n><px3sg><com> : атыныын
    ат<n><px3sg><comp> : атынааҕар

    ат<n><px1pl><nom> : аппыт
    ат<n><px1pl><acc> : аппытын
    ат<n><px1pl><par> : аппытына
    ат<n><px1pl><dat> : аппытыгар
    ат<n><px1pl><abl> : аппытыттан
    ат<n><px1pl><ins> : аппытынан
    ат<n><px1pl><com> : аппытыныын
    ат<n><px1pl><comp> : аппытынааҕар

    ат<n><px2pl><nom> : аккыт
    ат<n><px2pl><acc> : аккытын
    ат<n><px2pl><par> : аккытына
    ат<n><px2pl><dat> : аккытыгар
    ат<n><px2pl><abl> : аккытыттан
    ат<n><px2pl><ins> : аккытынан
    ат<n><px2pl><com> : аккытыныын
    ат<n><px2pl><comp> : аккытынааҕар

    ат<n><px3pl><nom> : аттара
    ат<n><px3pl><acc> : аттарын
    ат<n><px3pl><par> : аттарына
    ат<n><px3pl><dat> : аттарыгар
    ат<n><px3pl><abl> : аттарыттан
    ат<n><px3pl><ins> : аттарынан
    ат<n><px3pl><com> : аттарыныын
    ат<n><px3pl><comp> : аттарынааҕар
